South Dakota, session 2026, HB1310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $10,000,000 from the revolving economic development and
initiative fund, to the Governor's Office of Economic Development, for providing loans to assist
with the startup or expansion of custom exempt plants or slaughtering establishments in this
state, as defined in § 39-5-6, according to terms and conditions established by the office.
Section 2. The Governor's Office of Economic Development may not provide a loan pursuant
to this Act exceeding $1,000,000 to any one custom exempt plant or slaughtering
establishment. The loan provided by the office is subordinate to other loans received by the
custom exempt plant or slaughtering establishment for the same purpose.
Section 3. The commissioner of the Governor's Office of Economic Development shall
approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized
in this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.